Utah statutes.
31A-30-107.1.   Individual discontinuance and nonrenewal.

(1) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a health benefit plan offered on an individual basis is renewable and continues in force:

(i)  with respect to all individuals or dependents; and

(ii)  at the option of the individual.

(b)  Subsection (1)(a) applies regardless of:

(i)  whether the contract is issued through:

(A)  a trust;

(B)  an association;

(C)  a discretionary group; or

(D)  other similar grouping; or

(ii)  the situs of delivery of the policy or contract.

(2)  A health benefit plan may be discontinued or nonrenewed:

(a)  for a network plan, if:

(i)  the individual no longer lives, resides, or works in:

(A)  the service area of the covered carrier; or

(B)  the area for which the covered carrier is authorized to do business; and

(ii)  coverage is terminated uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor relating to any covered individual; or

(b)  for coverage made available through an association, if:

(i)  the individual's membership in the association ceases; and

(ii)  the coverage is terminated uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of covered individuals.

(3)  A health benefit plan may be discontinued if:

(a)  a condition described in Subsection (2) exists;

(b)  the individual fails to pay premiums or contributions in accordance with the terms of the health benefit plan, including any timeliness requirements;

(c)  the individual:

(i)  performs an act or practice that constitutes fraud in connection with the coverage; or

(ii)  makes an intentional misrepresentation of material fact under the terms of the coverage;

(d)  the covered carrier:

(i)  elects to discontinue offering a particular health benefit product delivered or issued for delivery in this state; and

(ii) (A)  provides notice of the discontinuance in writing:

(I)  to each individual provided coverage; and

(II)  at least 90 days before the date the coverage will be discontinued;

(B)  provides notice of the discontinuation in writing:

(I)  to the commissioner; and

(II)  at least three working days prior to the date the notice is sent to the affected individuals;

(C)  offers to each covered individual on a guaranteed issue basis the option to purchase all other individual health benefit products currently being offered by the covered carrier for individuals in that market; and

(D)  acts uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of a covered individual or dependent of a covered individual who may become eligible for coverage; or

(e)  the covered carrier:

(i)  elects to discontinue all of the covered carrier's health benefit plans in the individual market; and

(ii) (A)  provides notice of the discontinuation in writing:

(I)  to each covered individual; and

(II)  at least 180 days before the date the coverage will be discontinued;

(B)  provides notice of the discontinuation in writing:

(I)  to the commissioner in each state in which an affected insured individual is known to reside; and

(II)  at least 30 working days prior to the date the notice is sent to the affected individuals;

(C)  discontinues and nonrenews all health benefit plans the covered carrier issues or delivers for issuance in the individual market; and

(D)  acts uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of a covered individual or a dependent of a covered individual who may become eligible for coverage.



Amended by Chapter 252, 2003 General Session

